Ohio, session 136, HB301.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 1350.01, 1350.011, 1350.02, 1350.03, 1350.04, and 1350.05 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 1350.01. As used in this chapter: (A)(1) "Authorized repair provider" means a person that has an arrangement with the original equipment manufacturer under which the original equipment manufacturer grants to the person a license to use a trade name, service mark, or other proprietary identifier for the purposes of offering diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of digital electronic equipment under the name of the original equipment manufacturer, or other arrangement with the original equipment manufacturer to offer such services on behalf of the original equipment manufacturer. (2) "Authorized repair provider" includes an original equipment manufacturer that offers the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of its own digital electronic equipment. (B) "Board-level component" means any electrical part attached to a circuit board, such as microchips, sensors, transistors, and capacitors. (C) "Diagnosis" means the process of identifying any issues that cause digital electronic equipment or parts for such equipment to not be in fully working order. (D)(1) "Digital electronic equipment" means any product that has a value over ten dollars, adjusted annually in the manner described in section 1350.011 of the Revised Code, that depends for its functioning, in whole or in part, on digital electronics embedded in or attached to the product. (2) "Digital electronic equipment" does not include any of the following: (a) A motor vehicle, utility vehicle, low-speed vehicle, or under-speed vehicle, as defined in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code; (b) An all-purpose vehicle, as defined in section 4519.01 of the Revised Code; (c) A watercraft, as defined by section 1546.01 of the Revised Code; (d) An aircraft, as defined in section 4561.01 of the Revised Code, an unmanned aerial vehicle system, as defined in section 4561.50 of the Revised Code, or a satellite; (e) A medical device; (f) Construction equipment, as defined in section 1353.01 of the Revised Code, including industrial, compact construction, mining, or road-building equipment; (g) A product purchased, installed, and maintained by a public utility, as defined in section 4905.02 of the Revised Code; (h) Safety communications equipment, for which the intended use is emergency response or prevention purposes by an emergency response organization, such as fire and rescue services, law enforcement, or emergency medical services; (i) A device, such as a set-top box, modem, or all-in-one device, that is distributed by a cable service provider, as defined by section 1332.01 of the Revised Code, or a telecommunications carrier, as defined by the "Telecommunications Act of 1996," 47 U.S.C. 153, and delivers internet, video, or voice services to a customer, if the service provider offers equivalent or better, readily available replacement equipment at no charge to the customer; (j) Fire alarm systems, intrusion detection equipment that is provided with a security monitoring service, life safety systems, and physical access control equipment, including electronic keypads and similar building access control electronics. (E) "Documentation" means any manual, diagram, reporting output, service code description, schematic, security code, password, or other guidance or information used in effecting the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of digital electronic equipment or parts for such equipment. (F) "Fair and reasonable terms" means making available parts, tools, or documentation that satisfy the conditions set forth in section 1350.03 of the Revised Code. (G) "Independent repair provider" means a person in this state that does not have an authorized repair provider arrangement described in division (A) of this section and that is engaged in the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of digital electronic equipment. (H) "Maintenance" means any act necessary to keep currently working digital electronic equipment or parts for such equipment in fully working order. (I) "Medical device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, contrivance, implant, or other similar or related article, including any component, part, or accessory, that is intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or other conditions, or in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease, in humans or animals. "Medical device" does not include general wellness products intended to maintain or encourage a healthy lifestyle and that are unrelated to the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, prevention, or treatment of a disease or condition. (J) "Modifications" or "modify" means any alteration to digital electronic equipment that is not maintenance and not a repair. (K) "Original equipment manufacturer" means a person that, in the normal course of business, is engaged in the business of selling, leasing, or otherwise supplying digital electronic equipment manufactured by or on behalf of itself, to any person. (L) "Owner" means a person that owns or leases digital electronic equipment purchased or used in this state. (M) "Part" means any piece or component, including board-level components, that is essential to the full functionality of digital electronic equipment, including any auxiliary attachments that improve the performance, safety, operation, or efficiency of such equipment. (N) "Parts pairing" means any practice by a product manufacturer of using software to identify component parts through a unique identifier. (O) "Repair" means any act needed to restore digital electronic equipment or parts for such equipment to fully working order. (P) "Tool" means any software program, hardware implement, or other apparatus used for diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of digital electronic equipment or parts for such equipment. "Tool" includes software or other mechanisms that provide, program, or pair a part; calibrate functionality; or perform any other function required to bring the equipment or part back to a fully functional condition, including any updates. Sec. 1350.011. In November, or as soon as practicable thereafter, each year that begins after the effective date of this section, the director of commerce shall increase or decrease the value threshold above which a product may qualify as digital electronic equipment by multiplying the value threshold that applies for that year by the cumulative percentage change in the consumer price index (all items, all urban consumers) prepared by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor for the twelve-month period ending on the immediately preceding thirtieth day of September. The amount resulting from the computation, rounded to the nearest one cent, applies to the following calendar year. The director shall publish on a web site maintained by the department of commerce the adjusted amount and the dates to which that amount applies. Sec. 1350.02. (A)(1) For digital electronic equipment and parts sold or used in this state, an original equipment manufacturer shall make available for purposes of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair any documentation, parts, and tools, including any updates to information or embedded software, to both of the following on fair and reasonable terms: (a) Any independent repair provider; (b) The owner of digital electronic equipment manufactured by or on behalf of, or sold or otherwise supplied by, the original equipment manufacturer. (2) Nothing in division (A)(1) of this section requires an original equipment manufacturer to make available a part that is no longer available to the original equipment manufacturer. (3) The documentation, parts, and tools described in division (A)(1) of this section shall be made available either directly by the original equipment manufacturer or by an authorized repair provider. (B) For digital electronic equipment that contains an electronic security lock or other security-related function, the original equipment manufacturer shall make available to the owner and to independent repair providers, on fair and reasonable terms, any special documentation, tools, and parts needed to disable the lock or function, and to reset it when disabled in the course of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the digital electronic equipment. Such documentation, tools, and parts may be made available by means of an appropriate secure system. (C) An original equipment manufacturer shall not use parts pairing or any other mechanism to do either of the following: (1) Prevent the installation or functioning of any otherwise-functional part, including a non-manufacturer approved replacement part or component; (2) Inhibit or reduce the functioning of any part or board-level component, such that replacement by an independent repair provider or the device owner would cause the device to operate with reduced functionality or performance. Sec. 1350.03. (A) With respect to documentation required to be made available under section 1350.02 of the Revised Code, the original equipment manufacturer shall make such documentation available at no charge, except that, when the documentation is requested in physical printed form, the original equipment manufacturer may charge for the reasonable, actual costs of preparing and sending the documentation. (B) With respect to tools required to be made available under section 1350.02 of the Revised Code, the original equipment manufacturer shall make such tools available, as follows: (1) At no charge, except that, when the tool is requested in physical form, the original equipment manufacturer may charge for the reasonable, actual costs of preparing and sending the tool; (2) Without requiring authorization or internet access for use or operation of the tool; (3) Without imposing impediments to the access or use of the tool to diagnose, maintain, or repair and enable full functionality of digital electronic equipment or parts for such equipment; (4) Without impairing the efficient and cost-effective performance of any such diagnosis, maintenance, or repair. (C) With respect to parts required to be made available under section 1350.02 of the Revised Code, the original equipment manufacturer shall make such parts available, either directly or through an authorized repair provider, to independent repair providers and owners at costs and terms that are equivalent to the most favorable costs and terms under which an original equipment manufacturer offers the part to an authorized repair provider, provided such costs and terms: (1) Account for any discount, rebate, convenient and timely means of delivery, means of enabling fully restored and updated functionality, right of use, or other incentive or preference the original equipment manufacturer offers to an authorized repair provider; (2) Account for any reasonable, actual costs, burdens, or impediments the original equipment manufacturer incurs to provide the part to the owner or to an independent repair provider; (3) Exclude any condition or substantial obligation or restriction that is not reasonably necessary for enabling the owner or independent repair provider to engage in the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of the digital electronic equipment made by or on behalf of the original equipment manufacturer; (4) Not be conditioned on an arrangement described in division (A) of section 1350.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1350.04. (A) Subject to division (B) of this section, a violation of section 1350.02 of the Revised Code is an unfair or deceptive act or practice in violation of section 1345.02 of the Revised Code. A person injured by a violation of section 1350.02 of the Revised Code has a cause of action and is entitled to the same relief available to a consumer under section 1345.09 of the Revised Code. All powers and remedies available to the attorney general to enforce sections 1345.01 to 1345.13 of the Revised Code are available to the attorney general to enforce section 1350.02 of the Revised Code. (B) No original equipment manufacturer or authorized repair provider shall be liable for any damage or injury caused to any digital electronic equipment by an independent repair provider or owner that occurs during the course of repair, diagnosis, maintenance, or modification of the digital electronic equipment, including: (1) Indirect, incidental, special, or consequential damages; (2) Loss of data, privacy, or profits; (3) Inability to use, or reduced functionality of, the digital electronic equipment. Sec. 1350.05. (A) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an original equipment manufacturer to divulge a trade secret to any owner or independent service provider except as necessary to provide documentation, parts, and tools on fair and reasonable terms. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to alter the terms of any authorized repair provider arrangement described in division (A) of section 1350.01 of the Revised Code in force between an authorized repair provider and an original equipment manufacturer, including the performance or provision of warranty or recall repair work by an authorized repair provider on behalf of an original equipment manufacturer pursuant to such arrangement. (2) Any provision in the terms of an authorized repair provider arrangement described in division (A) of section 1350.01 of the Revised Code that waives, avoids, restricts, or limits the original equipment manufacturer's obligations to comply with this chapter is void and unenforceable. (C) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an original equipment manufacturer or an authorized repair provider to provide to any owner or independent repair provider access to information, other than documentation, that is provided by the original equipment manufacturer to an authorized repair provider pursuant to the terms of an arrangement described in division (A) of section 1350.01 of the Revised Code. (D) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an original equipment manufacturer or authorized repair provider to make available any parts, tools, or documentation for the purposes of modifying or making modifications to any digital electronic equipment. (E) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an original manufacturer to make available special documentation, tools, parts, or other devices or implements that would disable or override, without an owner's authorization, anti-theft, privacy, or security measures that the owner activates for digital electronic equipment. (F) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an original equipment manufacturer or authorized repair provider to make available any parts, tools, or documentation required for the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of digital electronic equipment in a manner that is inconsistent with or in violation of any federal law. (G) Nothing in this chapter applies to a motor vehicle manufacturer, manufacturer of motor vehicle equipment, or motor vehicle dealer acting in that capacity, or to any product or service of a motor vehicle manufacturer, manufacturer of motor vehicle equipment, or motor vehicle dealer acting in that capacity. (H) Nothing in this chapter applies to a medical device or other digital electronic products found in a medical setting that are primarily and customarily used in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or animals and that are generally not useful for other purposes. (I) Nothing in this chapter applies to a manufacturer or dealer of farming or forestry equipment acting in that capacity, or to any product or service of a manufacturer or dealer of farming or forestry equipment acting in that capacity. (J) This chapter applies after the one hundred twentieth day following the effective date of this section. Section 2. Chapter 1350. of the Revised Code may be cited as the "Digital Fair Repair Act."